Maryland, session 2025, HB0547.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
19–349.3.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “FEDERAL PRICE TRANSPARENCY LAW” MEANS 42 U.S.C. §
300GG–18 AND HOSPITAL PRICE TRANSPARENCY RULES ADOPTED BY THE U.S.
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES AND THE CENTERS FOR
MEDICARE AND MEDICAID SERVICES IMPLEMENTING 42 U.S.C. § 300GG–18,
INCLUDING THE RULES AND REQUIREMENTS UNDER 45 C.F.R. § 180.
(3) “HOSPITAL” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 19–301 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(4) (I) “PERSONAL DATA” MEANS INFORMATION THAT IS LINKED
OR REASONABLY LINKABLE TO AN IDENTIFIED OR IDENTIFIABLE INDIVIDUAL IN THE
STATE.
(II) “PERSONAL DATA” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
1. PUBLICLY AVAILABLE INFORMATION; OR
2. DATA THAT HAS BEEN DEIDENTIFIED OR
AGGREGATED USING COMMERCIALLY REASONABLE METHODS IN A MANNER THAT
NEITHER THE ASSOCIATED INDIVIDUAL, NOR A DEVICE LINKED TO THE INDIVIDUAL,
CAN BE REASONABLY IDENTIFIED.
(5) “PROCESS” MEANS AN OPERATION PERFORMED ON PERSONAL
DATA, WHETHER OR NOT BY AUTOMATED MEANS, INCLUDING THE COLLECTION,
USE, STORAGE, DISCLOSURE, ANALYSIS, DELETION, TRANSFER, OR MODIFICATION
OF PERSONAL DATA.

HOUSE BILL 547 3
(6) “PUBLICLY AVAILABLE INFORMATION” MEANS INFORMATION
THAT IS LAWFULLY MADE AVAILABLE FROM FEDERAL, STATE, OR LOCAL
GOVERNMENT RECORDS OR WIDELY AVAILABLE MEDIA.
(7) “SHOPPABLE SERVICE” MEANS A SERVICE THAT MAY BE
SCHEDULED BY A HEALTH CARE CONSUMER IN ADVANCE.
(8) (I) “TARGETED ADVERTISING” MEANS DISPLAYING AN
ADVERTISEMENT THAT IS SELECTED BASED ON PERSONAL DATA OBTAINED FROM
THE USE OF A HOSPITAL’S INTERNET–BASED PRICE ESTIMATOR TOOL BY A PERSON
IN THE STATE.
(II) “TARGETED ADVERTISING” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
1. ADVERTISING IN RESPONSE TO THE USER’S REQUEST
FOR INFORMATION OR FEEDBACK;
2. ADVERTISING BASED ON ACTIVITIES WITHIN A
HOSPITAL’S OWN WEBSITE OR ONLINE APPLICATION;
3. ADVERTISING BASED ON THE CONTEXT OF A USER’S
CURRENT SEARCH QUERY, VISIT TO A WEBSITE, OR ONLINE APPLICATION; OR
4. PROCESSING PERSONAL DATA SOLELY FOR
MEASURING OR REPORTING ADVERTISING PERFORMANCE, REACH, OR FREQUENCY.
(B) IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT, EXCEPT AS
OTHERWISE EXPRESSLY PROVIDED OR CLEARLY APPEARING FROM THE CONTEXT,
ANY TERM USED IN THIS SECTION THAT IS NOT OTHERWISE DEFINED IN THIS
SECTION HAS THE SAME MEANING AS WHEN USED IN A COMPARABLE CONTEXT IN
THE FEDERAL PRICE TRANSPARENCY LAW.
(C) (1) EACH HOSPITAL LOCATED IN THE STATE SHALL COMPLY WITH
THE FEDERAL PRICE TRANSPARENCY LAW.
(2) (I) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPHS (3) AND (4) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, A HOSPITAL LOCATED IN THE STATE SHALL MAINTAIN AND MAKE
PUBLICLY AVAILABLE A LIST OF THE STANDARD CHARGES FOR THE HOSPITAL’S
SHOPPABLE SERVICES, IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE FEDERAL PRICE TRANSPARENCY
LAW.
(II) A HOSPITAL SHALL INCLUDE ON THE LIST REQUIRED
UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH:

HOUSE BILL 547
1. FROM OCTOBER 1, 2025, TO SEPTEMBER 30, 2029,
BOTH INCLUSIVE:
A. IF THE HOSPITAL PROVIDES AT LEAST 400
SHOPPABLE SERVICES, AT LEAST 400 SHOPPABLE SERVICES PROVIDED BY THE
HOSPITAL; OR
B. IF THE HOSPITAL PROVIDES FEWER THAN 400
SHOPPABLE SERVICES, ALL SHOPPABLE SERVICES PROVIDED BY THE HOSPITAL;
AND
2. BEGINNING OCTOBER 1, 2029:
A. IF THE HOSPITAL PROVIDES AT LEAST 500
SHOPPABLE SERVICES, AT LEAST 500 SHOPPABLE SERVICES PROVIDED BY THE
HOSPITAL; OR
B. IF THE HOSPITAL PROVIDES FEWER THAN 500
SHOPPABLE SERVICES, ALL SHOPPABLE SERVICES PROVIDED BY THE HOSPITAL.
(III) THE HOSPITAL SHALL PUBLISH THE LIST REQUIRED UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH:
1. IN A MACHINE–READABLE FORMAT THAT CONFORMS
WITH ANY TEMPLATE REQUIRED BY THE FEDERAL PRICE TRANSPARENCY LAW; AND
2. IN A MANNER THAT IS READABLE IN PLAIN LANGUAGE
WITHOUT THE USE OF SOFTWARE.
(3) A HOSPITAL THAT MAINTAINS AN INTERNET–BASED PRICE
ESTIMATOR TOOL DETERMINED BY THE CENTERS FOR MEDICARE AND MEDICAID
SERVICES TO MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF THE FEDERAL PRICE TRANSPARENCY
LAW REGARDING THE LIST OF STANDARD CHARGES FOR SHOPPABLE SERVICES
MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION IF THE HOSPITAL TAKES REASONABLE
STEPS TO:
(I) IMPROVE THE ACCURACY AND PERFORMANCE OF THE
INTERNET–BASED PRICE ESTIMATOR TOOL; AND
(II) REGULARLY UPDATE THE UNDERLYING DATA USED BY THE
INTERNET–BASED PRICE ESTIMATOR TOOL AND AUDIT PRICE ESTIMATES
GENERATED BY THE TOOL FOR QUALITY ASSURANCE PURPOSES.

HOUSE BILL 547 5
(4) (I) A HOSPITAL MAY NOT SELL PERSONAL DATA ACQUIRED
FROM THE USE OF A HOSPITAL’S INTERNET–BASED PRICE ESTIMATOR TOOL BY A
PERSON IN THE STATE.
(II) A HOSPITAL MAY NOT USE, SELL, OR PROCESS PERSONAL
DATA ACQUIRED FROM THE USE OF THE HOSPITAL’S INTERNET–BASED PRICE
ESTIMATOR TOOL BY A PERSON IN THE STATE FOR THE PURPOSES OF TARGETED
ADVERTISING.
(D) (1) A HOSPITAL SHALL:
(I) COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENT TO MAKE PUBLIC
EITHER OR BOTH OF THE LISTS DESCRIBED IN THE FEDERAL PRICE TRANSPARENCY
LAW; AND
(II) MAINTAIN EITHER OR BOTH OF THE LISTS REQUIRED BY
THE FEDERAL PRICE TRANSPARENCY LAW IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
REQUIREMENTS OF 45 C.F.R. § 180.
(2) THE SECRETARY SHALL MONITOR EACH HOSPITAL’S
COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SECTION THROUGH:
(I) EVALUATING COMPLAINTS MADE BY INDIVIDUALS TO THE
SECRETARY;
(II) REVIEWING A CREDIBLE ANALYSIS PREPARED REGARDING
COMPLIANCE OR NONCOMPLIANCE BY THE HOSPITAL; AND
(III) AUDITING A HOSPITAL’S WEBSITE FOR COMPLIANCE.
(3) (I) THE SECRETARY SHALL CREATE AND MAKE PUBLICLY
AVAILABLE A LIST THAT IDENTIFIES EACH HOSPITAL THAT IS NOT IN COMPLIANCE
WITH PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(II) THE LIST OF NONCOMPLIANT HOSPITALS SHALL INCLUDE
EACH HOSPITAL THAT:
1. HAS BEEN SENT A NOTICE OF VIOLATION UNDER
SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION;
2. IS SUBJECT TO AN ORDER IMPOSING AN
ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTY UNDER SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION;

HOUSE BILL 547
3. HAS BEEN SENT OTHER WRITTEN COMMUNICATION
FROM THE SECRETARY REGARDING A VIOLATION OF PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION; OR
4. OTHERWISE HAS BEEN DETERMINED BY THE
SECRETARY TO BE OUT OF COMPLIANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(III) THE LIST OF NONCOMPLIANT HOSPITALS IS A PUBLIC
RECORD, AS DEFINED IN § 4–101 OF THE GENERAL PROVISIONS ARTICLE.
(IV) IF THE SECRETARY DETERMINES THAT A HOSPITAL IS NOT
IN COMPLIANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, ANY RELATED NOTICE,
ORDER, COMMUNICATION, OR DETERMINATION MADE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
SECTION IS A PUBLIC RECORD, AS DEFINED IN § 4–101 OF THE GENERAL
PROVISIONS ARTICLE.
(4) THE SECRETARY SHALL:
(I) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 30, 2025, CREATE THE INITIAL
LIST OF NONCOMPLIANT HOSPITALS AND INCLUDE THE LIST ON THE
DEPARTMENT’S WEBSITE; AND
(II) UPDATE THE LIST AND WEBSITE AT LEAST EVERY 30 DAYS
THEREAFTER.
(E) (1) (I) IF THE SECRETARY DETERMINES THAT A HOSPITAL HAS
VIOLATED SUBSECTION (D)(1) OF THIS SECTION, THE SECRETARY SHALL ISSUE A
NOTICE OF VIOLATION TO THE HOSPITAL.
(II) THE NOTICE OF VIOLATION SHALL:
1. CLEARLY EXPLAIN THE MANNER IN WHICH THE
HOSPITAL IS NOT IN COMPLIANCE;
2. REQUIRE THE HOSPITAL TO SUBMIT A CORRECTIVE
ACTION PLAN TO THE SECRETARY;
3. INDICATE THE FORM AND MANNER IN WHICH THE
CORRECTIVE ACTION PLAN IS TO BE SUBMITTED; AND

HOUSE BILL 547 7
4. INCLUDE THE DATE BY WHICH THE HOSPITAL IS
REQUIRED TO SUBMIT THE PLAN, WHICH MAY NOT BE LESS THAN 15 DAYS AFTER
THE NOTICE IS SENT.
(2) (I) A HOSPITAL THAT RECEIVES A NOTICE OF VIOLATION
SHALL SUBMIT TO THE SECRETARY A CORRECTIVE ACTION PLAN IN THE FORM AND
MANNER INDICATED AND BY THE DATE SPECIFIED IN THE NOTICE.
(II) IN THE CORRECTIVE ACTION PLAN, THE HOSPITAL SHALL
PROVIDE A DETAILED DESCRIPTION OF THE CORRECTIVE ACTION THE HOSPITAL
WILL TAKE TO ADDRESS EACH VIOLATION IDENTIFIED IN THE NOTICE OF
VIOLATION.
(III) THE HOSPITAL SHALL SPECIFY THE DATE BY WHICH THE
HOSPITAL WILL COMPLETE THE CORRECTIVE ACTION, WHICH MAY NOT BE MORE
THAN 90 DAYS AFTER THE PLAN IS SUBMITTED.
(3) (I) A CORRECTIVE ACTION PLAN IS SUBJECT TO REVIEW AND
APPROVAL BY THE SECRETARY.
(II) AFTER THE SECRETARY REVIEWS AND APPROVES THE
PLAN, THE SECRETARY SHALL MONITOR AND EVALUATE THE HOSPITAL’S
COMPLIANCE WITH THE PLAN.
(4) A HOSPITAL SHALL:
(I) RESPOND TO THE SECRETARY’S REQUIREMENT TO SUBMIT
A CORRECTIVE ACTION PLAN;
(II) SUBMIT A CORRECTIVE ACTION PLAN IN THE FORM AND
MANNER INDICATED IN THE NOTICE OF VIOLATION OR BY THE DATE SPECIFIED IN
THE NOTICE; AND
(III) COMPLETE THE CORRECTIVE ACTION REQUIRED IN THE
PLAN BY THE DATE SPECIFIED IN THE PLAN.
(F) (1) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER STATE LAW, THE SECRETARY
SHALL IMPOSE AN ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTY ON A HOSPITAL IF THE HOSPITAL
VIOLATES SUBSECTIONS (D)(1) AND (E)(4) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) EACH DAY A HOSPITAL VIOLATES SUBSECTIONS (D)(1) AND (E)(4)
OF THIS SECTION IS CONSIDERED A SEPARATE VIOLATION.

HOUSE BILL 547
(3) (I) IN IMPOSING AN ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTY UNDER THIS
SECTION, THE SECRETARY SHALL ACT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE ADMINISTRATIVE
PROCEDURE ACT UNDER TITLE 10, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE.
(II) THE SECRETARY SHALL DETERMINE THE AMOUNT OF THE
PENALTY TO BE IMPOSED ON A HOSPITAL, SUBJECT TO THE MAXIMUM AMOUNTS AND
CONSIDERATIONS SPECIFIED IN PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(III) FOR ANY PENALTY THAT IS IMPOSED, THE SECRETARY
SHALL SELECT AN AMOUNT THAT IS SUFFICIENT TO ENSURE THAT THE HOSPITAL
COMPLIES WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
(4) (I) AN ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTY IMPOSED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE MORE THAN:
1. $300 FOR A HOSPITAL WITH 30 OR FEWER BEDS;
2. $10 PER BED FOR A HOSPITAL WITH MORE THAN 30
BEDS BUT FEWER THAN 551 BEDS; AND
3. $5,500 FOR A HOSPITAL WITH MORE THAN 550 BEDS.
(II) IN DETERMINING THE AMOUNT OF THE PENALTY TO IMPOSE
ON A HOSPITAL, THE SECRETARY SHALL CONSIDER:
1. ANY PREVIOUS VIOLATION BY THE HOSPITAL’S
OPERATOR;
2. THE SERIOUSNESS OF THE VIOLATION;
3. ANY DEMONSTRATED GOOD FAITH OF THE
HOSPITAL’S OPERATOR; AND
4. ANY OTHER MATTERS AS JUSTICE MAY REQUIRE.
(5) AN ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTY COLLECTED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE DEPOSITED INTO THE HOSPITAL PRICE TRANSPARENCY
FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 24–2501 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(G) (1) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2027, THE
SECRETARY SHALL REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH §

HOUSE BILL 547 9
2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON EACH
HOSPITAL THAT VIOLATES SUBSECTIONS (D)(1) AND (E)(4) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) WITHIN 60 DAYS AFTER ANY CHANGE TO THE FEDERAL PRICE
TRANSPARENCY LAW, THE SECRETARY SHALL PREPARE A REPORT OF THE
SECRETARY’S RECOMMENDATIONS FOR CONFORMING THIS SECTION WITH THE
CHANGE, OR ALTERNATIVELY, STATING THAT NO CONFORMING CHANGES ARE
NECESSARY, AND PROMPTLY SUBMIT THE REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY.
(H) THE SECRETARY SHALL IMPLEMENT A PUBLIC AWARENESS CAMPAIGN
TO INFORM MEMBERS OF THE PUBLIC REGARDING THE AVAILABILITY OF THE
HOSPITAL PRICE INFORMATION AND OTHER CONSUMER RIGHTS UNDER THIS
SECTION.
(I) THE SECRETARY MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.
19–349.4.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “FUND” MEANS THE HOSPITAL PRICE
TRANSPARENCY FUND.
(B) THERE IS A HOSPITAL PRICE TRANSPARENCY FUND.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO PROVIDE MONEY FOR
ADMINISTERING AND ENFORCING § 19–349.3 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(D) THE SECRETARY SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(E) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTIES COLLECTED UNDER § 19–349.3 OF
THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND;

HOUSE BILL 547
(3) INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND; AND
(4) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(G) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY FOR ADMINISTERING AND ENFORCING §
19–349.3 OF THIS SUBTITLE, INCLUDING THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THE PUBLIC
AWARENESS CAMPAIGN REQUIRED UNDER § 19–349.3(H) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(H) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE FUND.
(I) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (1) Except as otherwise specifically provided by law or by regulation of the
Treasurer, the Treasurer shall credit to the General Fund any interest on or other income
from State money that the Treasurer invests.
(2) (i) 1. This subparagraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024
through 2028.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(ii) The provisions of subparagraph (i) of this paragraph do not apply
to the following funds:
204. the Victims of Domestic Violence Program Grant Fund;
[and]
205. the Proposed Programs Collaborative Grant Fund; AND

HOUSE BILL 547 11
206. THE HOSPITAL PRICE TRANSPARENCY FUND.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.